Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299K.07, is amended to read: 299K.07 NOTIFICATION TOnew text begin STATEnew text end EMERGENCY deleted text begin MANAGEMENTdeleted text end new text begin OPERATIONSnew text end CENTER. (a) The notification of the commission required under the federal act must be made to the State Emergency deleted text begin Managementdeleted text end new text begin Operationsnew text end Center. The owner or operator of a facility deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end immediately notify the State Emergency deleted text begin Managementdeleted text end new text begin Operationsnew text end Center of the release of a reportable quantity of the following materials: (1) a hazardous substance on the list established under United States Code, title 42, section 9602; or (2) an extremely hazardous substance on the list established under United States Code, title 42, section 11002. (b) This section does not apply to a release that results in exposure to persons solely within the site or sites on which a facility is located or to a release specifically authorized by state law. (c) A person who is required to report to or notify a state agency of a discharge, release, or incident under section 221.0341, this chapter, chapter 18B, 18C, 18D, 115, 115A, 115B, 115C, 115D, 116, or 299J, or any other statute, administrative rule, or federal regulation may satisfy the requirement to report by notifying the new text begin State new text end Emergency deleted text begin Managementdeleted text end new text begin Operationsnew text end Center established in this section. The commissioner of deleted text begin the Department ofdeleted text end public safety deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end ensure that the center is staffed with adequate personnel to answer all calls 24 hours a day and that those staff are adequately trained to efficiently notify all appropriate state and federal agencies with jurisdiction over the discharge or releasedeleted text begin ,deleted text end and provide emergency responder information. No state agency may adopt a rule or guideline that requires a person who notifies the new text begin State new text end Emergency deleted text begin Managementdeleted text end new text begin Operationsnew text end Center to also notify that agency. The commissioner of each affected state agency deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end include the telephone number of the new text begin State new text end Emergency deleted text begin Managementdeleted text end new text begin Operationsnew text end Center in all files, permits, correspondence, educational publications, and other communications with the public and other personsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end and deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end designate personnel to coordinate receipt of reports or notifications with new text begin State new text end Emergency deleted text begin Managementdeleted text end new text begin Operationsnew text end Center personnel. new text begin (d) Immediately after reporting to or notifying the State Emergency Operations Center under paragraph (a) or (c), the owner or operator of a facility whose primary purpose is the processing of crude oil into petroleum products, as defined in section 296A.01, subdivision 42, must also notify the local emergency personnel with responsibility to protect public health by responding to a discharge, release, or incident from the facility. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to a discharge, release, or incident occurring on or after that date. new text end